Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.409

Bonds—Committee advice and consent prerequisite to issuance.

All bonds issued after February 16, 1974 by the college board or any board of trustees for any college district under provisions of chapter 28B.50 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, shall be issued by such boards only upon the prior advice and consent of the state finance committee.

[ 1991 c 238 s 56; 1974 ex.s. c 112 s 7.]